fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-wahkwa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - wâhk - ok : # -m animate noun, fish eggs AEW NA4w
     wâhkwa+N+A+Sg: wâhkwa
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: niwâhkom
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kiwâhkom
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: niwâhkominân
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: kiwâhkominaw
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kiwâhkomiwâw

     wâhkwa+N+A+Pl: wâhkwak
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: niwâhkomak
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kiwâhkomak
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: niwâhkominânak
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: kiwâhkominawak
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kiwâhkomiwâwak
     
     wâhkwa+N+A+Obv: wâhkwa
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: niwâhkoma
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kiwâhkoma
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: niwâhkominâna
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px21Pl+Obv: kiwâhkominawa
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kiwâhkomiwâwa
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: owâhkoma
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: owâhkomiwâwa
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa
     
     wâhkwa+N+A+Loc: wâhkohk
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px1Sg+Loc: niwâhkomihk
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwâhkomihk
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px1Pl+Loc: niwâhkominâhk
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px21Pl+Loc: kiwâhkominâhk
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwâhkomiwâhk
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px3Sg+Loc: owâhkomihk
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px3Pl+Loc: owâhkomiwâhk
     wâhkwa+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: owâhkomiyihk

     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [wâhkos, wâhkosis]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [niwâhkomis, niwâhkomisis]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kiwâhkomis, kiwâhkomisis]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [niwâhkomisinân, niwâhkomisisinân]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: [kiwâhkomisinaw, kiwâhkomisisinaw]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kiwâhkomisiwâw, kiwâhkomisisiwâw]



     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [wâhkosak, wâhkosisak]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [niwâhkomisak, niwâhkomisisak]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kiwâhkomisak, kiwâhkomisisak]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [niwâhkomisinânak, niwâhkomisisinânak]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: [kiwâhkomisinawak, kiwâhkomisisinawak]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kiwâhkomisiwâwak, kiwâhkomisisiwâwak]
     
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: [owâhkomisa, owâhkomisisa]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: [owâhkomisiwâwa, owâhkomisisiwâwa]
     wâhkwa+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [owâhkomisiyiwa, owâhkomisisiyiwa]
